Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1160.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1117-A of act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 1117-A. Statistical Sample.--The following shall apply:(1) The county board of elections, as part of the computation and canvass of returns, shall conduct a statistical recount of a random sample of ballots after each election using manual, mechanical or electronic devices of a type different 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 than those used for the specific election. The sample shall include at least two (2) per centum of the votes cast or two thousand (2,000) votes whichever is the lesser.(2) Each county board of elections shall randomly select three precincts during each general, primary or municipal election and require a hand count of all the ballots in the selected precinct.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1160PN1286 - 2 - 12345678